Utah statutes.
41-12a-606.   Authority of political subdivisions to adopt ordinances.

The provisions of this chapter shall be applied uniformly throughout the state and in all municipalities and other political subdivisions.  Local authorities may, however, adopt regulations or ordinances consistent with this chapter and additional traffic regulations which are not in conflict with this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 242, 1985 General Session

